Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.13, subdivision 35, is amended to read: Subd. 35. Homestead market value exclusion. (a) Prior to determining a property's net tax capacity under this section, property classified as 4d(2) under subdivision 25, paragraph (e), clause (2), class 1a, or 1b under subdivision 22, and the portion of property classified as class 2a under subdivision 23 consisting of the house, garage, and surrounding one acre of land, shall be eligible for a market value exclusion as determined under paragraph (b)new text begin or (c)new text end . (b)new text begin For assessment year 2025 and assessment year 2028 and thereafter, the exclusion under this subdivision shall be determined under this paragraph.new text end For a homestead valued at $95,000 or less, the exclusion is 40 percent of market value. For a homestead valued between $95,000 and $517,200, the exclusion is $38,000 minus nine percent of the valuation over $95,000. For a homestead valued at $517,200 or more, there is no valuation exclusion. The valuation exclusion shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar, and may not be less than zero. new text begin (c) For assessment years 2026 and 2027, the exclusion under this subdivision shall be determined under this paragraph. For a homestead valued at $107,450 or less, the exclusion is 40 percent of market value. For a homestead valued between $107,450 and $585,000, the exclusion is $42,980 minus nine percent of the valuation over $107,450. For a homestead valued at $585,000 or more, there is no valuation exclusion. The valuation exclusion shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar and may not be less than zero. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Any valuation exclusions or adjustments under section 273.11 shall be applied prior to determining the amount of the valuation exclusion under this subdivision. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end In the case of a property that is classified as part homestead and part nonhomestead, (i) the exclusion shall apply only to the homestead portion of the property, but (ii) if a portion of a property is classified as nonhomestead solely because not all the owners occupy the property, not all the owners have qualifying relatives occupying the property, or solely because not all the spouses of owners occupy the property, the exclusion amount shall be initially computed as if that nonhomestead portion were also in the homestead class and then prorated to the owner-occupant's percentage of ownership. For the purpose of this section, when an owner-occupant's spouse does not occupy the property, the percentage of ownership for the owner-occupant spouse is one-half of the couple's ownership percentage. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with assessment year 2025 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PROPERTY TAX REFUNDS; TEMPORARY INCREASE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Temporary increase in refund amounts. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for refunds based on property taxes payable in 2026 and 2027, the amount of a claimant's property tax refund under Minnesota Statutes, section 290A.04, subdivisions 2 and 2h, is increased as provided in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Homestead credit state refund. new text end new text begin (a) The amount of a taxpayer's homestead credit state refund under Minnesota Statutes, section 290A.04, subdivision 2, must be calculated with the following modifications to the credit formula: new text end new text begin (1) the maximum state refund amount, after the adjustment for inflation under Minnesota Statutes, section 290A.04, subdivision 4, is increased by $500; and new text end new text begin (2) the percent paid by a claimant is reduced by five percentage points. new text end new text begin (b) A claimant with household income in excess of $126,290, but not more than $155,000, is eligible for a refund. The parameters used to calculate the refund are as follows: new text end new text begin (1) for a claimant with household income in excess of $126,290, but not more than $135,000, the following parameters apply: new text end new text begin (i) the percent of income is 2.6 percent; new text end new text begin (ii) the percent paid by a claimant is 50 percent; and new text end new text begin (iii) the maximum state refund is $850; new text end new text begin (2) for a claimant with household income in excess of $135,000, but not more than $145,000, the following parameters apply: new text end new text begin (i) the percent of income is 2.7 percent; new text end new text begin (ii) the percent paid by a claimant is 50 percent; and new text end new text begin (iii) the maximum state refund is $600; and new text end new text begin (3) for a claimant with household income in excess of $145,000 but not more than $155,000, the following parameters apply: new text end new text begin (i) the percent of income is 2.8 percent; new text end new text begin (ii) the percent paid by a claimant is 50 percent; and new text end new text begin (iii) the maximum state refund is $350. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Sunset. new text end new text begin This section expires for refunds based on property taxes payable in 2028 and later. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for refunds based on property taxes payable in 2026 and 2027. new text end